Nebraska, session 109, LB579.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-712, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-712 (1) Except as otherwise expressly provided by statute, all
residents of this state and all other persons interested in the
examination of the public records as defined in section 84-712.01 are
hereby fully empowered and authorized to (a) examine such records, and
make memoranda, make copies using their own copying or photocopying
equipment in accordance with subsection (2) of this section, and make
abstracts therefrom, all free of charge, during the hours the respective
offices may be kept open for the ordinary transaction of business and (b)
unless except if federal copyright law otherwise provides, obtain copies
of public records in accordance with subsection (3) of this section
during the hours the respective offices may be kept open for the ordinary
transaction of business.
(2) Copies made by residents or other persons using their own
copying or photocopying equipment pursuant to subdivision (1)(a) of this
section shall be made on the premises of the custodian of the public
record or at a location mutually agreed to by the requester and the
custodian.
(3)(a) Copies may be obtained pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of this
section only if the custodian has copying equipment reasonably available.
Such copies may be obtained in any form designated by the requester in
which the public record is maintained or produced, including, but not
limited to, printouts, electronic data, discs, tapes, and photocopies.
This section shall not be construed to require a custodian to copy any
public record that is available to the requester on the custodian's
website on the Internet. The custodian of the public record is required
to provide the location of the public record on the Internet to the
requester. If the requester does not have reasonable access to the
Internet due to lack of computer, lack of Internet availability, or
inability to use a computer or the Internet, the custodian shall produce
-2-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
copies for the requester as provided in this section.
(b) Except as provided subdivision (3)(i) of this section and as
otherwise provided by statute, the public body, public entity, or public
official which is the custodian of a public record may charge a fee for
providing copies of such public record pursuant to subdivision (1)(b) of
this section, which fee shall not exceed the actual added cost of making
the copies available. For purposes of this subdivision, (i) for
photocopies, the actual added cost of making the copies available shall
not exceed the amount of the reasonably calculated actual added cost of
the photocopies, which may include a reasonably apportioned cost of the
supplies, such as paper, toner, and equipment, used in preparing the
copies, as well as any additional payment obligation of the custodian for
time of contractors necessarily incurred to comply with the request for
copies, (ii) for printouts of computerized data on paper, the actual
added cost of making the copies available shall include the reasonably
calculated actual added cost of computer run time and the cost of
materials for making the copy, and (iii) for electronic data, the actual
added cost of making the copies available shall include the reasonably
calculated actual added cost of the computer run time, any necessary
analysis and programming by the public body, public entity, public
official, or third-party information technology services company
contracted to provide computer services to the public body, public
entity, or public official, and the production of the report in the form
furnished to the requester.
(c) For residents of Nebraska, the actual added cost used as the
basis for the calculation of a fee for records shall not include any
charge for the existing salary or pay obligation to the public officers
or employees with respect to the first eight cumulative hours of
searching, identifying, physically redacting, or copying. A special
service charge reflecting the calculated labor cost may be included in
the fee for time required in excess of eight cumulative hours, since that
-3-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
large of a request may cause some delay or disruption of the other
responsibilities of the custodian's office, except that the fee for
records shall not include any charge for the services of an attorney or
any other person to review the requested public records seeking a legal
basis to withhold the public records from the public. No special service
charge or fee shall be charged for copies of blank forms or pages that
have all meaningful information redacted.
(d) For nonresidents of Nebraska, the actual added cost used as the
basis for the calculation of a fee for records may include a charge for
the proportion of the existing salary or pay obligation to the public
officers or employees, including a proportional charge for the services
of an attorney to review the requested public records, for the time spent
searching, identifying, physically redacting, copying, or reviewing such
records.
(e) State agencies which provide electronic access to public records
through a portal established under section 84-1204 shall obtain approval
of their proposed reasonable fees for such records pursuant to sections
84-1205.02 and 84-1205.03, if applicable, and the actual added cost of
making the copies available may include the approved fee for the portal.
(f) This section shall not be construed to require a public body or
custodian of a public record to produce or generate any public record in
a new or different form or format modified from that of the original
public record.
(g) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(i) of this section, if If
copies requested in accordance with subdivision (1)(b) of this section
are estimated by the custodian of such public records to cost more than
fifty dollars, the custodian may require the requester to furnish a
deposit prior to fulfilling such request.
(h) The custodian may waive or reduce any fee described in this
section if the waiver or reduction of the fee would be in the public
interest. Waiver or reduction of the fee is in the public interest if
-4-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
disclosure of the public record at issue is likely to contribute to the
understanding of the operations or activities of government and is not
primarily in the commercial interest of the person requesting such
records.
(i) No fee shall be charged under this section for a request made by
a member of the Legislature.
(4)(a) (4) Upon receipt of a written request for access to or copies
of a public record, the custodian of such record shall provide to the
requester as soon as is practicable and without delay, but not more than
four business days after actual receipt of the request, an estimate of
the expected cost of the copies and either (i) (a) access to or, if
copying equipment is reasonably available, copies of the public record,
(ii) (b) if there is a legal basis for denial of access or copies, a
written denial of the request together with the information specified in
section 84-712.04, or (iii) (c) if the entire request cannot with
reasonable good faith efforts be fulfilled within four business days
after actual receipt of the request due to the significant difficulty or
the extensiveness of the request, a written explanation, including the
earliest practicable date for fulfilling the request, an estimate of the
expected cost of any copies, and an opportunity for the requester to
modify or prioritize the items within the request.
(b) The requester shall have ten business days to review the
estimated costs, including any special service charge, and request the
custodian to fulfill the original request, negotiate with the custodian
to narrow or simplify the request, or withdraw the request. If the
requester does not respond to the custodian within ten business days, the
custodian shall not proceed to fulfill the request.
(c) The four business days shall be computed by excluding the day
the request or response is received, after which the designated period of
time begins to run. Business day does not include a Saturday, a Sunday,
or a day during which the offices of the custodian of the public records
-5-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
are closed.
(5) For purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09, resident means a
person domiciled in this state and includes news media without regard to
domicile.
Sec. 2. Section 84-712.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-712.01 (1) Except when any other statute expressly provides that
particular information or records shall not be made public, public
records shall include all records and documents, regardless of physical
form, of or belonging to this state, any county, city, village, political
subdivision, or tax-supported district in this state, or any agency,
branch, department, board, bureau, commission, council, subunit, or
committee of any of the foregoing. Data which is a public record in its
original form shall remain a public record when maintained in computer
files.
(2) When a custodian of a public record of a county provides to a
member of the public, upon request, a copy of the public record by
transmitting it from a modem to an outside modem, a reasonable fee may be
charged for such specialized service except as provided in subsection (3)
of this section. Such fee may include a reasonable amount representing a
portion of the amortization of the cost of computer equipment, including
software, necessarily added in order to provide such specialized service.
This subsection shall not be construed to require a governmental entity
to acquire computer capability to generate public records in a new or
different form when that new form would require additional computer
equipment or software not already possessed by the governmental entity.
(3) No fee shall be charged under this section for a request made by
a member of the Legislature.
(4) (3) Sections 84-712 to 84-712.03 shall be liberally construed
whenever any state, county, or political subdivision fiscal records,
audit, warrant, voucher, invoice, purchase order, requisition, payroll,
-6-

LB579 LB579
2025 2025
check, receipt, or other record of receipt, cash, or expenditure
involving public funds is involved in order that the residents of this
state shall have the full right to know of and have full access to
information on the public finances of the government and the public
bodies and entities created to serve them.
Sec. 3. Original sections 84-712 and 84-712.01, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-7-